South Dakota, session 2026, HB1147.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. There is appropriated $5,000,000 $1,500,000 from the general fund, to the
Department of Agriculture and Natural Resources, to provide a single grant to a South Dakota-
based statewide food distribution organization which distributes food to all counties of the
state for the purchase and distribution of food and the subsequent distribution to food pantries
throughout this state.
Section 2. The department shall require the grantee to utilize at least $1,500,000 of the
entire grant to purchase food from local farmers and other eligible producers in this state.
The department shall provide guidance regarding the qualifications of farmers and producers,
for purposes of this section.
Section 3. By November first of each year, the department shall provide an annual report to
the special committee created in § 4-8A-2 until the grantee has spent the entire grant
amount. The report must include the amount of the grant spent each fiscal year, the type and
amount of food purchased with the grant, and the organizations to which the food was
distributed.
Section 4. The secretary of the Department of Agriculture and Natural Resources shall
approve vouchers and the state auditor shall draw warrants to pay expenditures authorized
in this Act.
Section 5. Any amounts appropriated in this Act not lawfully expended or obligated shall
revert in accordance with the procedures prescribed in chapter 4-8.
Section 6. This Act is effective beginning June 30, 2026.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.